Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 3. Shares.

§79-10-31.
Issuance of shares.

A professional corporation may issue shares, fractional shares and rights or options to purchase shares only to:

Individuals who are authorized by law in this or another state to render a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation;

Professional corporations, domestic or foreign, authorized by law in this state to render a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation;

General partnerships in which all the partners are individuals or entities otherwise authorized by paragraph (a), (b) or (d) of this subsection (1) to be shareholders of a professional corporation under this chapter;

Any other individual or entity not included in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection (1) if expressly authorized by the licensing authority having jurisdiction over the professional services described in the articles of incorporation of the professional corporation.

A licensing authority with jurisdiction over a profession may by rule restrict or condition, or revoke in part, the authority of professional corporations subject to its jurisdiction to issue shares. A rule promulgated under this section does not, of itself, make a shareholder of a professional corporation at the time the rule becomes effective a disqualified person.

The articles of incorporation may provide for additional limitations and restrictions on the ownership of shares or for additional qualifications of shareholders and such limitations, restrictions or qualifications shall be valid and enforceable in each instance.

Shares issued in violation of this section or a rule promulgated under this section are void.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Disqualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 40.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 609-788.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 261 et seq.

§79-10-33.
Notice of professional corporation status on shares.

In addition to any other statement required or permitted by applicable law, the following statement must appear conspicuously on each share certificate issued by a professional corporation:

The transfer of shares of a professional corporation is restricted by the Mississippi Professional Corporation Act. Shares of a professional corporation are also subject to a statutory compulsory repurchase obligation.

Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of uncertificated shares of a professional corporation, the corporation shall send the shareholders a written notice containing the statement required by subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§79-10-35.
Share transfer restriction.

A shareholder of a professional corporation may transfer shares, fractional shares and rights or options to purchase shares of the corporation only to qualified persons. A shareholder of a professional corporation may pledge shares to a qualified person or to a disqualified person.

A transfer of shares made in violation of subsection (1), except one made by operation of law or court judgment, is void.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Disqualified person and qualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 570, 572.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, §§ 285 et seq.

§79-10-37.
Compulsory acquisition of shares after death or disqualification of shareholder.

A professional corporation must acquire (or cause to be acquired by a qualified person) the shares of its shareholder if:

The shareholder dies and the successor in interest to the deceased shareholder is not a qualified person, except as provided in subsection (3);

The shareholder becomes a disqualified person, except as provided in subsection (3); or

The shares are transferred by operation of law or court judgment to a disqualified person, except as provided in subsection (3).

If a price for the shares is established in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws or by private agreement, that price controls. If the price is not so established, the corporation shall acquire the shares in accordance with Section 79-10-39. If the disqualified person rejects the corporation’s purchase offer made pursuant to Section 79-10-39, either the person or the corporation may commence a proceeding under Section 79-10-41 to determine the price of the shares.

This section does not require the acquisition of shares in the event of disqualification if the disqualification lasts no more than five (5) months from the date the disqualification or transfer occurs. A shareholder who becomes a disqualified person shall notify the corporation promptly.

This section and Section 79-10-39 do not prevent or relieve a professional corporation from paying pension benefits or other deferred compensation for services rendered to a former shareholder if otherwise permitted by law.

A provision for the acquisition of shares contained in a professional corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, or in a private agreement, is specifically enforceable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Disqualified person and qualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.

Where an employment agreement between an attorney and a law firm, which had previously been determined to be a valid agreement by a federal court, provided that the attorney had to relinquish her shares in the firm if she was terminated as an employee, the agreement was enforceable under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-10-37(5). Jowett v. Scruggs, 901 So. 2d 638, 2004 Miss. App. LEXIS 768 (Miss. Ct. App. 2004), cert. denied, 901 So. 2d 1273, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 312 (Miss. 2005).

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2354-2355.

§79-10-39.
Acquisition procedure.

If shares must be acquired under Section 79-10-37, the professional corporation shall deliver a written notice to the executor or administrator of the estate of its deceased shareholder, or to the disqualified person or transferee, offering to purchase the shares at a price the corporation believes represents their fair value as of the date of death, disqualification, or transfer. The offer notice must be accompanied by the corporation’s balance sheet for the most recent fiscal year ending prior to the date of death or disqualification, an income statement for that fiscal year, a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for that fiscal year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any.

The disqualified person has thirty (30) days from the effective date of the notice to accept the corporation’s offer or demand that the corporation commence a proceeding under Section 79-10-41 to determine the fair value of his shares. If he accepts the offer, the corporation shall make payment for the shares within sixty (60) days from the effective date of the offer notice (unless a later date is agreed on) upon the disqualified person’s surrender of his shares to the corporation.

After the corporation makes payment for the shares, the disqualified person has no further interest in them.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Disqualified person and qualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.

Cancellation of disqualified shares, see § 79-10-45.

Application of section to existing professional corporations, see § 79-10-111.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1697.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 380, 381.

§79-10-41.
Court action to appraise shares.

If the disqualified shareholder does not accept the professional corporation’s offer under Section 79-10-39(2) within the thirty-day period, the shareholder during the following thirty-day period may deliver a written notice to the corporation demanding that it commence a proceeding to determine the fair value of the shares. The corporation may commence a proceeding at any time during the sixty (60) days following the effective date of its offer notice. If it does not do so, the shareholder may commence a proceeding against the corporation to determine the fair value of his shares.

The corporation or disqualified shareholder shall commence the proceeding in the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located. The corporation shall make the disqualified person a party to the proceeding as in an action against his shares. The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced is plenary and exclusive.

The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the power described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it.

The disqualified shareholder is entitled to judgment for the fair value of his shares determined by the court as of the date of death, disqualification or transfer together with interest from that date at a rate found by the court to be fair and equitable.

The court may order the judgment paid in installments determined by the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Assessment of appraisal proceeding court costs and fees, see § 79-10-43.

Cancellation of disqualified shares, see § 79-10-45.

Application of section to existing professional corporations, see § 79-10-111.

§79-10-43.
Court costs and fees of experts.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under Section 79-10-41 shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court, and shall assess the costs against the professional corporation. But the court may assess costs against the disqualified shareholder, in an amount the court finds equitable, if the court finds the shareholder acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in refusing to accept the corporation’s offer.

The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the disqualified shareholder against the corporation and in favor of the shareholder if the court finds that the fair value of his shares substantially exceeded the amount offered by the corporation or that the corporation did not make an offer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Application of section to existing professional corporations, see § 79-10-111.

§79-10-45.
Cancellation of disqualified shares.

If the shares of a disqualified person are not acquired under Section 79-10-39 or 79-10-41 within ten (10) months after the death of the shareholder or within five (5) months after the disqualification or transfer, the professional corporation shall immediately cancel the shares on its books and the disqualified person has no further interest as a shareholder in the corporation other than his right to payment of the fair value of the shares under Section 79-10-39 or 79-10-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Disqualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.